Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-2315
Violations; penalties.

Any person violating sections 18-2301 to 18-2315 or any rules or regulations adopted or ordinances passed pursuant to such sections shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined not more than five hundred dollars, or be imprisoned not more than six months, or be both so fined and imprisoned, and as a part of such punishment such person's license may be revoked.

Laws 1969, c. 98, § 15, p. 473;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 159.
August 28, 2021